Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5373.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 23-27.3-100.1.4, 23-27.3-100.1.5 and 23-27.3-108.2 of the General
Laws in Chapter 23-27.3 entitled "State Building Code" are hereby amended to read as follows:
23-27.3-100.1.4. Appointment and qualifications of the committee.
(a) The building code standards committee shall be composed of twenty-five (25)
members, residents of the state who shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent
of the senate. Eight (8) members are to be appointed for terms of one year each, seven (7) for a
term of two (2) years each, and ten (10) for terms of three (3) years each. Annually, thereafter, the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint members to the committee to
succeed those whose terms expired; the members to serve for terms of three (3) years each and until
their successors are appointed and qualified. Two (2) members shall be architects registered in the
state; three (3) shall be professional engineers registered in the state, one specializing in
mechanical, one specializing in structural, and one specializing in electrical engineering; one
landscape architect, registered in the state; one full-time certified electrical inspector; two (2) shall
be builders or superintendents of building construction; one shall be a public health official; one
shall be a qualified fire code official; two (2) shall be from the Rhode Island building trades council;
two (2) shall be from the Rhode Island Builders Association; one shall be a holder of Class “A”
electrician’s license; one shall be a master plumber; two (2) shall be from the general public; three
(3) shall be building officials in office, one from a municipality with a population of sixty thousand
(60,000) persons or more, one from a municipality with a population of over twenty thousand

(20,000) persons but less than sixty thousand (60,000), and one from a municipality with a
population of less than twenty thousand (20,000) persons; one shall be a minimum housing official
in office from one of the local municipalities; and two (2) residents of the state who shall be persons
with disabilities as defined in § 42-87-1.
(b) All members shall have no less than five (5) years practical experience in their
profession or business. The committee shall elect its own chairperson and may elect from among
its members such other officers as it deems necessary. Thirteen (13) A majority of the current
members of the board shall constitute a quorum and the vote of a majority vote of those present
shall be required for action. The committee shall adopt rules and regulations for procedure. The
state building commissioner shall serve as the executive secretary to the committee. The committee
shall have the power, within the limits of appropriations provided therefor, to employ such
assistance as may be necessary to conduct business.
(c) Members of the committee shall be removable by the governor pursuant to § 36-1-7
and for cause only, and removal solely for partisan or personal reasons unrelated to capacity or
fitness for the office shall be unlawful.
(d) The state housing and property maintenance code subcommittee shall be composed of
nine (9) members, residents of the state. Five (5) of these members are to be current members of
the state building code standards committee and are to be appointed by that committee. The four
(4) remaining members are to be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the
senate. The four (4) appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall
initially be appointed on a staggered term basis, one for one year, one for two (2) years, and two
(2) for three (3) years. Annually thereafter, the building code standards committee, and the
governor, with the advice and consent of the senate, shall appoint the subcommittee members, for
which they are respectively responsible, to succeed those whose terms have expired; the members
to serve for terms of three (3) years each and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Of
the members appointed by the committee, one shall be a full-time certified electrical inspector; one
shall be a master plumber and mechanical equipment expert; one shall be a builder or
superintendent of building construction; one member shall be a qualified state fire code official;
one shall be a property manager; and one shall be a current minimum housing official from a local
municipality. The four (4) members to be appointed by the governor, with the advice and consent
of the senate, shall all be current minimum housing officials from local municipalities. One shall
be from a municipality with a population of sixty thousand (60,000) persons or more, two (2) from
municipalities with a population of over twenty thousand (20,000) persons but less than sixty
thousand (60,000), and one from a municipality with a population of less than twenty thousand
LC001263 - Page 2 of 7

(20,000) persons.
23-27.3-100.1.5. Building code — Adoption and promulgation by committee.
The state building code standards committee has the authority to adopt, promulgate, and
administer a state building code, which shall include: (a) Provisions and amendments as necessary
to resolve conflicts between fire safety codes and building codes, as provided for in § 23-28.01-6;
and (b) A rehabilitation building and fire code for existing buildings and structures.
Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the building code, including any amendments
adopted by the state building code standards committee, shall be adopted by the state and shall be
fully enforceable by the state building code office within ninety (90) days of approval by the state
building code standards committee. The building code may shall be promulgated in several
sections, with a section applicable: to one-, two (2), three (3), and four (4) and two-family (2)
dwellings using the 2024 International Residential Code (IRC) or any subsequent version thereof;
to multiple dwellings with more than four (4) family dwellings, and hotels and motels using the
2024 commercial International Building Code (IBC) or any subsequent version thereof; to general
building construction; to plumbing; and to electrical. The building code shall incorporate minimum
standards for the location, design, construction, and installation of wells that are appurtenances to
a building in applicable sections. For purposes of this chapter, “appurtenance” includes the
installation, alteration, or repair of wells connected to a structure consistent with chapter 13.2 of
title 46. The building code and the sections thereof shall be reasonably consistent with recognized
and accepted standards adopted by national model code organizations and recognized authorities.
To the extent that any state or local building codes, statutes, or ordinances are inconsistent with the
Americans with Disabilities Act, Title III, Public Accommodations and Services Operated by
Private Entities, 42 U.S.C. § 12181 et seq., and its regulations and standards, they are hereby
repealed. The state building code standards committee is hereby directed to adopt rules and
regulations consistent with the Americans with Disabilities Act, Title II and III (28 C.F.R. 35 and
28 C.F.R. 36, as amended), as soon as possible, but no later than February 15, 2012, to take effect
on or before March 15, 2012. The state building code standards committee is hereby authorized
and directed to update those rules and regulations consistent with the future revisions of the
Americans with Disabilities Act Accessibility Standards. All electrical work done in the state shall
be in accordance with the latest edition of the National Electrical Code (NEC). The state building
commission shall adopt the latest edition of the NEC, including any amendments to the NEC by
the commission. The adoption of the NEC by the commission shall be completed so that it will take
effect on the first day of July of the year the edition is dated.
23-27.3-108.2. Duties of the state building code commissioner.
LC001263 - Page 3 of 7

(a) The state building code commissioner shall have the authority to enforce and perform
the duties required by the state building code, chapter 27.3 of this title, and all codes referenced
therein and adopted thereunder, and all other provisions of the general laws and public laws insofar
as such powers and duties relate to building codes and building inspection; provided, however, that
for the purposes of this section structures constituting tents and/or membrane frame structures as
defined in this state building code and any regulations promulgated hereunder shall be subject to
an annual certification process to be established by the state building commissioner in conjunction
with the state fire marshal and shall not be subject to recurring permit and fee requirements as
otherwise required by this code.
(b) The state building code commissioner shall work to standardize building code
interpretations across the state with input from the Rhode Island League of Cities and Towns and
ensure consistent enforcement of the code throughout the state.
(c) Permit fees for the projects shall be established by the committee. The fees shall be
deposited as general revenues.
(d)(1) The local cities and towns shall charge each permit applicant an additional one-tenth
percent (0.1%) levy of the total construction cost for each commercial permit issued, and two-tenths
percent (0.2%) levy of the total construction cost for each residential permit issued. The levy shall
be limited to a maximum of one hundred dollars ($100) for each of the permits issued for one- and,
two- (2), three (3), and four (4) family (2) dwellings. This additional levy shall be transmitted
monthly to the state building office at the department of business regulation; and
(i) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits and one hundred
percent (100%) of this additional levy on commercial permits shall be used to staff and support the
purchase or lease and operation of a web-accessible service and/or system to be utilized by the state
and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan review, permit management, and
inspection system and other programs described in this chapter. This portion of the fee levy shall
be deposited as general revenues.
(ii) Fifty percent (50%) of this additional levy on residential permits shall be transferred to
the department of labor and training and shall be deposited into the contractor training restricted
receipt account, which shall be exempt from the indirect cost recovery provisions of § 35-4-27.
Subject to appropriation by the general assembly, these funds shall be used to provide contractor
training grants for programs that shall include, but are not limited to, minority business enterprises
and state local building officials.
(2) On or before July 1, 2013, the building commissioner shall develop a standard statewide
process for electronic plan review, permit management, and inspection. The process shall include,
LC001263 - Page 4 of 7

but not be limited to: applications; submission of building plans and plans for developments and
plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation
and collections; and workflow and report management.
(3) On or before December 1, 2013, the building commissioner, with the assistance of the
office of regulatory reform, shall implement the standard statewide process for electronic plan
review, permit management, and inspection. In addition, the building commissioner shall develop
a technology and implementation plan for a standard web-accessible service or system to be utilized
by the state and municipalities for uniform, statewide electronic plan review, permit management,
and inspection. The plan shall include, but not be limited to: applications; submission of building
plans and plans for developments and plots; plan review; permitting; inspections; inspection
scheduling; project tracking; fee calculation and collections; and workflow and report management.
(e) The building commissioner shall, upon request by any state contractor described in §
37-2-38.1, review, and when all conditions for certification have been met, certify to the state
controller that the payment conditions contained in § 37-2-38.1 have been met.
(f) The building commissioner shall coordinate the development and implementation of
this section with the state fire marshal to assist with the implementation of § 23-28.2-6. On or before
January 1, 2022, the building commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement
the provisions of this section and § 23-27.3-115.6.
(g) The building commissioner shall submit, in coordination with the state fire marshal, a
report to the governor and general assembly on or before April 1, 2013, and each April 1 thereafter,
providing the status of the web-accessible service and/or system implementation and any
recommendations for process or system improvement. In every report submitted on or after April,
2024, the building commissioner shall provide the following information:
(1) The identity of every municipality in full compliance with the provisions § 23-27.3-
115.6 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the provisions of this section;
(2) The identity of every municipality failing to fully implement and comply with the
provisions of § 23-27.3-115.6 and/or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of this section, and the nature, extent, and basis or reason for the failure or
noncompliance; and
(3) Recommendations to achieve compliance by all municipalities with the provisions of §
23-27.3-115.6 and the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this section.
(h) The building commissioner shall assist with facilitating the goals and objectives set
forth in § 28-42-84(a)(9).
(i) The state building code commissioner shall serve as the executive secretary to the state
LC001263 - Page 5 of 7

building code standards committee.
(j) In addition to the state building code commissioner’s other duties as set forth in this
chapter, and notwithstanding the same, the state building code commissioner and the
commissioner’s staff shall assume the authority for the purposes of enforcing the provisions of the
state building code in a municipality where there is no local building official or alternate as detailed
in § 23-27.3-107.2, or where there are no local building inspectors.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001263
========
LC001263 - Page 6 of 7